Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.250

Money received by treasurer from certain court actions—Use.

(1) The money received by the state treasurer from fees, fines, forfeitures, penalties, reimbursements or assessments by any court organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, or chapter 2.08 RCW, shall be deposited in the state general fund.

(2) The money received by the state treasurer from the increase in fees imposed by sections 9, 10, 12, 13, 14, 17, and 19, chapter 457, Laws of 2005 shall be deposited in the state general fund. It is the intent of the legislature that fifty percent of such money be appropriated to the administrator for the courts for the purposes of contributing to district court judges' salaries and to eligible elected municipal court judges' salaries. It is further the intent of the legislature that the balance of such moneys be used to fund criminal indigent defense assistance and enhancement at the trial court level, representation of parents in dependency and termination proceedings, and civil legal representation of indigent persons.

[ 2009 c 479 s 26; 2008 c 329 s 913; 2007 c 522 s 950. Prior: 2005 c 518 s 926; 2005 c 457 s 8; 2005 c 282 s 44; 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 918; prior: 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 914; 2001 c 289 s 4; 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 911; 1999 c 309 s 915; 1997 c 149 s 910; 1996 c 283 s 901; 1995 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 912; 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 917; 1992 c 54 s 3; prior: 1991 sp.s. c 16 s 919; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 25; 1985 c 57 s 27; 1984 c 258 s 338.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Severability—Effective date—2008 c 329: See notes following RCW 28B.105.110.

Severability—Effective date—2007 c 522: See notes following RCW 15.64.050.

Effective date—2005 c 518: See note following RCW 28A.600.110.

Intent—2005 c 457: "The legislature recognizes the state's obligation to provide adequate representation to criminal indigent defendants and to parents in dependency and termination cases. The legislature also recognizes that trial courts are critical to maintaining the rule of law in a free society and that they are essential to the protection of the rights and enforcement of obligations for all. Therefore, the legislature intends to create a dedicated revenue source for the purposes of meeting the state's commitment to improving trial courts in the state, providing adequate representation to criminal indigent defendants, providing for civil legal services for indigent persons, and ensuring equal justice for all citizens of the state." [ 2005 c 457 s 1.]

Findings—Effective date—2005 c 105: See RCW 2.53.005 and 2.53.900.

Severability—Effective date—2003 1st sp.s. c 25: See notes following RCW 19.28.351.

Severability—Effective date—2001 2nd sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.320.110.

Severability—Effective date—2000 2nd sp.s. c 1: See notes following RCW 41.05.143.

Severability—Effective date—1999 c 309: See notes following RCW 41.06.152.

Severability—1997 c 149: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1997 c 149 s 917.]

Effective date—1997 c 149: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1997." [ 1997 c 149 s 918.]

Severability—1996 c 283: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1996 c 283 s 904.]

Effective date—1996 c 283: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [March 30, 1996]." [ 1996 c 283 s 905.]

Severability—Effective date—1995 2nd sp.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 19.118.110.

Severability—Effective dates—1993 sp.s. c 24: See notes following RCW 28A.310.020.

Effective date—1992 c 54: See note following RCW 36.18.020.

Severability—Effective date—1991 sp.s. c 16: See notes following RCW 9.46.100.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Intent—1984 c 258: See note following RCW 3.34.130.

Public safety and education assessment: RCW 3.62.090.